Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4263.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "event online ticket sales act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Entertainment event" means a concert, theatrical performance, sporting event, exhibition, show, or similar scheduled activity held in this state that meets all of the following: (i) Is open to the public. (ii) Is held in a public or private venue. (iii) Charges an admission fee to attend. (b) "Person" means any of the following: (i) An individual. (ii) A sole proprietorship, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity. (iii) A combination of persons described in subparagraphs (i) and (ii). (c) "Ticket" means a physical, electronic, or other form of a certificate, voucher, document, token, or other evidence indicating that the person entitled to possession through purchase or otherwise has a right to enter a venue for an entertainment event at the date and time specified on the ticket. (d) "Ticket purchasing limit" means the posted limit stating the number of tickets a person may purchase for a specific entertainment event during an online ticket sale. Sec. 5. A person shall not circumvent or disable a security measure, access control system, or other technological control or measure used to do any of the following: (a) Enforce a ticket purchasing limit. (b) Enforce an electronic queue, waiting period, presale code, or other sales volume limitation system associated with an online ticket sale. (c) Validate that a ticket is not fraudulent. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00710'25) or House Bill No. 4262 (request no. H00710'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.